tables/hu-hu-g1.ctb
#Other exceptions With need marking different dot combination
endnum # 123456
prepunc # 123456
postpunc # 123456
punctuation # 123456
always # 123456
endnum $ 5-145
prepunc $ 5-145
postpunc $ 5-145
always $ 5-145
always % 3456-245-356
endnum ~ 5-2345
prepunc ~ 5-2345
punctuation ~ 5-2345
postpunc ~ 5-2345
always ~ 5-2345
endnum < 5-13
prepunc < 5-13
postpunc < 5-13
always < 5-13
endnum > 46-2
prepunc > 46-2
postpunc > 46-2
always > 46-2
always / 5-2
endnum | 5-1245
prepunc | 5-1245
postpunc | 5-1245
always | 5-1245
endnum { 5-2346
prepunc { 5-2346
postpunc { 5-2346
always { 5-2346
endnum } 5-1356
prepunc } 5-1356
postpunc } 5-1356
always } 5-1356
endnum [ 46-2346
prepunc [ 46-2346
postpunc [ 46-2346
always [ 46-2346
endnum ] 46-1356
prepunc ] 46-1356
postpunc ] 46-1356
always ] 46-1356
endnum \\ 5-16
prepunc \\ 5-16
postpunc \\ 5-16
always \\ 5-16
endnum ^ 5-124
prepunc ^ 5-124
postpunc ^ 5-124
always ^ 5-124
endnum ` 5-14
prepunc ` 5-14
postpunc ` 5-14
punctuation ` 5-14
always ` 5-14
noback always Æ 1
endnum lyú 456-346
always lyú 456-346
endnum lysz 456-156
always lysz 456-156
endnum ä 5-1
prepunc ä 5-1
postpunc ä 5-1
always ä 5-1
noback context $l$p["–"] @36-36
noback context $l["–"] @36-36
noback always \\_ 6 letter sign before Roman page numbers
noback pass2 @3456-356 @356-3456
include hu-hu-g1_braille_input.cti
undefined 26
